District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.21

Eligibility standards for children of unemployed parents.

(a)

Repealed.

(a-1)

Repealed.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

The parent who is the principal wage earner must be referred to job search, job readiness, or other work activities after application for TANF benefits.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 521, 29 DCR 1060
Oct. 27, 1995, D.C. Law 11-72, § 201(d), 42 DCR 4728
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(x), 46 DCR 905
Dec. 17, 2009, D.C. Law 18-94, § 2(d), 56 DCR 8521

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-205.21.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-94 repealed subsecs. (a) and (b).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-25, February 27, 1997, 44 DCR 1778), and § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-77, May 27, 1997, 44 DCR 3181).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-306, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1900).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(x) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(x) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682), § 2(x) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(x) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-198, October 9, 2009, 56 DCR 8132).

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 11-72

See note to § 4-205.01.